Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-706. Presentation of list of legislators elected.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, on the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly, to lay before each house a list of members elected in accordance with the returns in his or her office.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-807.

7-5-707. Vote certification.

(a)

For all state and federal elections, the county board of election commissioners shall transmit the certified results for each precinct to the Secretary of State through the election night reporting interface provided by the Secretary of State.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners may, by agreement with the county clerk, transmit the certified results to the county clerk who shall transmit the certified results by precinct to the Secretary of State as described in subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Secretary of State may require a county board of election commissioners to submit additional election information as determined by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1396, § 1; 2003, No. 131, § 2; 2003, No. 994, § 13; 2005, No. 67, § 14; 2007, No. 559, § 5; 2009, No. 959, § 33; 2011, No. 1238, § 1; 2013, No. 1058, § 2; 2013, No. 1126, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2003, No. 994. This section was also amended by Acts 2003, No. 131, § 2, to read as follows:

“Vote certification — Report. (a) At the time that the county board of election commissioners certifies the vote to the Secretary of State, the county board shall report to the State Board of Election Commissioners the total number of: (1) Ballots cast; (2) Ballots printed and delivered to the polls; (3) Challenged ballots that were disqualified; (4) Spoiled ballots; and (5) Unused ballots.

“(b)

Within thirty (30) calendar days after any election, the county board shall report to the state board the number of over-votes and under-votes cast in the election.

“(c)(1)

Certified results for each polling place shall be entered and transmitted to the Secretary of State through the Internet website interface provided by the Secretary of State for all state and federal elections.

“(2)

If it is not possible for the county board to transmit the results via the Internet website interface, then the county board may transmit the results by facsimile transmission.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b)(10) and made related changes; and substituted “a statement ... county election commissioner” for “an affidavit, under the signature of all three (3) commissioners or individually, with the state board in a form approved by the state board to the effect that all duties and responsibilities of the county election commissioner have been complied with” in (e).

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b) and deleted former (c) through (e).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1058, in (a), substituted “precinct to the Secretary of State through the election night reporting interface provided by the Secretary of State” for “polling place to the county clerk, who shall immediately transmit the results to the Secretary of State through the Internet website interface provided by the Secretary of State”; inserted (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1126 deleted “Internet” following “State through the” in (a).

Subchapter 8

— Election Contests

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

7-5-801. Right of action — Procedure.

(a)

A right of action is conferred on any candidate to contest the certification of nomination or the certificate of vote as made by the appropriate officials in any election.

(b)

The action shall be brought in the circuit court of the county in which the certification of nomination or certificate of vote is made when a county or city or township office, including the office of county delegate or county committee member, is involved, and except as provided in this subchapter, within any county in the circuit or district wherein any of the wrongful acts occurred when any circuit or district office is involved, and except as provided in this subchapter, in the Pulaski County Circuit Court when the office of United States Senator or any state office is involved.

(c)

If there are two (2) or more counties in the district where the action is brought and when fraud is alleged in the complaint, answer, or cross-complaint, the circuit court may hear testimony in any county in the district.

(d)

The complaint shall be verified by the affidavit of the contestant to the effect that he or she believes the statements to be true and shall be filed within twenty (20) days of the certification that is the subject of the complaint.

(e)

The complaint shall be answered within twenty (20) days.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1001; Acts 2013, No. 1126, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “that is the subject of the complaint” for “complained of” in (d).

Particular Offices.

Township road overseer was “township officer.” Condren v. Gibbs, 94 Ark. 478, 127 S.W. 731 (1910) (decision under prior law).

School officers are county officers. Ferguson v. Wolchansky, 133 Ark. 516, 202 S.W. 826 (1918) (decision under prior law).

The prosecuting attorney is not a state officer within law, requiring contests for nomination to state offices to be in Pulaski County. Morrow v. Strait, 186 Ark. 384, 53 S.W.2d 857 (1932) (decision under prior law).

Candidate's post-election challenge to a state senate runoff election was properly brought within the circuit or district in which alleged voter fraud occurred; further, the Secretary of State and the State Democratic Committee were not indispensable parties for complete relief under Ark. R. Civ. P. 19 because the office of state senator was not a “state office” as that term had been differentiated in §§7-7-401 and7-5-804, and Ark. Const. art. 5, §§ 3 and 4.
Willis v. Crumbly, 368 Ark. 5, 242 S.W.3d 600 (2006).

Parties.

The party claiming the office and the state may join as plaintiffs against another in possession of the office. Whittaker v. Watson, 68 Ark. 555, 60 S.W. 652 (1901) (decision under prior law).

In an election contest, as distinguished from an action seeking to void an election, the election commission is not the proper party defendant, although it is a proper nominal defendant because the commission's function is to promote fair elections, to act in a disinterested manner in disputes between candidates or their representatives, and to take neither side in a contest. Rubens v. Hodges, 310 Ark. 451, 837 S.W.2d 465 (1992).

There is no statute governing who is the proper party defendant in an election contest situation where a candidate dies before an election, and the deceased candidate prevails in the election, and the results of the election are contested by another candidate. Rubens v. Hodges, 310 Ark. 451, 837 S.W.2d 465 (1992).

7-5-802. Circuit court proceedings.

(a)

If the complaint is sufficiently definite to make a prima facie case, unless the circuit court in which it is filed is in session or is to convene within thirty (30) days, the judge shall call a special term which shall possess the powers of a court convened in a regular term, and shall proceed at once to hear the case. The session of the special term to hear these cases shall not interfere with the validity of other courts proceeding at the same time in the circuit.

(b)

If the case comes in regular term, it shall be given precedence and be speedily determined. The judge may adjourn other courts in order to hear these cases and may call another judge in exchange to sit in other courts or vacate the bench in other courts and cause a special judge to be elected to hold the court.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1002.

7-5-803. Special judges for additional contests.

(a)

In the event that there are more election contests brought under this section than the circuit court judge can dispose of prior to ten (10) days before any election to be held, either of the parties to the contest may so report to the circuit judge in vacation or otherwise, who shall have full and complete authority to appoint an attorney with the qualifications of circuit judge to hear any contest and render a final judgment in such contest.

(b)

The circuit judge shall appoint as special judge any attorney named by a committee of three (3) qualified electors of the county in which the contest is pending, one (1) to be named by the contestant, one (1) to be named by the contestee, and the third to be named by those two (2) committee members. In the event that the first two (2) committee members do not agree within five (5) days on the third member, then the third member shall be chosen by lot from the respective choices of the two committee members.

(c)

All proceedings shall be conducted as in the case of any regular judge trying any such case, including the right of appeal. The judge so appointed shall have full power and authority in the trial of election contests in all respects as are now conferred by the Arkansas Constitution upon circuit judges in this state. The judgment rendered by the attorney so appointed shall be binding with full force and effect as if the regular circuit judge had heard the cause.

(d)

In the appointment of the attorney, the circuit judge shall not be confined in the selection of the attorney to the judicial circuit in which the contest is pending. However, the hearing of the contest shall be had in the county in which the contest has been filed.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1003.

7-5-804. Trial — Appeal — Enforcement — Other laws superseded.

(a)

The election contest shall be tried by the circuit judge in open court without a jury.

(b)

An appeal may be taken from the judgment. However, the appeal shall not operate as a supersedeas by judicial order or otherwise and the judgment of the circuit court shall be obeyed by officeholders, political committees and their officers, and all election officials, until reversed. It shall be the duty of the Supreme Court to advance the hearing of any such appeal.

(c)

The circuit court or, when necessary, the circuit judge in vacation shall enforce by mandamus to the officers of political parties and election officials, or both, or the Secretary of State the proper certification and proper ballot in accordance with the judgment of the court and shall punish the failure of any such officers to obey the mandamus by imprisonment in the county jail.

(d)

Except as provided in this subchapter, all laws pertaining to general and special elections or rules of political organizations regarding primary elections providing for contest before political conventions or committees, other than the proceedings provided in this subchapter, shall be of no further force or effect.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1004; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 36.

7-5-805. Contest of state legislative offices.

(a)

Any contest to the eligibility, qualifications, or election to serve as a member of the Senate shall be in accordance with the rules and procedures for election contests as established by that chamber under its governing rules.

(b)(1)(A)

Any action to contest eligibility, qualification, or election to serve as a member of the House of Representatives shall be initiated by filing a complaint with the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

(B)

This procedure shall apply to House of Representatives election contests pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 11, to contests of eligibility pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9, and to actions for expulsion pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 12, except that a member of the House of Representatives shall be automatically suspended from the legislative process if a representative under felony criminal indictment is subsequently found guilty or pleads guilty.

(C)(i)

If a representative under a felony criminal indictment in any federal or state court is subsequently found guilty or pleads guilty to the charges, then the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall immediately declare the representative suspended from the legislative process, and notification shall be given to the convicted representative, all members of the House of Representatives, the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the Auditor of State.

(ii)

(a)

However, if a representative who was found guilty appeals that conviction, then the representative may petition the House Management Committee for a stay of the suspension from the legislative process, and the House Management Committee may grant a stay upon the filing of the petition and a notice of appeal to the relevant appellate court.

(b)

The stay of the suspension shall continue until the appeal is complete or until the House of Representatives takes final action on the conviction.

(D)

A representative suspended from the legislative process shall not participate in interim committee meetings nor in extraordinary or regular sessions of the General Assembly and shall not accept per diem and mileage but shall be eligible to retain the title of office and salary as a member of the General Assembly and is authorized to assist constituents and utilize legislative staff until a final action is taken by the House of Representatives.

(2)

For House of Representatives election contests, the complaint shall be filed within fifteen (15) days after the election returns are certified by the county board of election commissioners. A responsive pleading shall be filed by the House of Representatives contestee within fifteen (15) days after receipt of the complaint unless an earlier or later date is set by the commission for good cause shown. Upon receipt of the complaint, the commission shall establish a schedule for discovery and hearing, which schedule shall allow the commission to take and review evidence presented by the parties and submit a nonbinding recommendation to the House of Representatives no later than five (5) days before the date fixed for the assembling of the General Assembly.

(3)

For eligibility contests for the House of Representatives pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9, a complaint shall be filed at any time after the election of the individual to a seat in the House of Representatives. For action for expulsion from the House of Representatives pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 12, the complaint shall be filed at any time permitted by law. A responsive pleading shall be filed within twenty (20) days after receipt of the complaint unless an earlier or later date is set by the commission for good cause shown. The commission shall establish a schedule for discovery and hearing, which schedule shall allow the commission to take and review evidence presented by the parties and submit a nonbinding recommendation to the House of Representatives in a timely fashion.

(4)

An additional copy of all complaints filed pursuant to this subsection shall be served on the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one (1) member of the chamber from each political party to serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the commission for the consideration of all matters relating to the complaint.

(5)

In those actions concerning a seat in the House of Representatives, the recommendation is to be made to the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall present the nonbinding recommendation to the members of the House of Representatives, and the members shall take such actions as they deem appropriate.

(6)

The commission is authorized to promulgate any rules necessary to carry out the provisions set forth herein regarding contests for the seats in the House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1008; Acts 1991, No. 1014, § 1; 2001, No. 452, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 420.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(6).

7-5-806. Contest of state constitutional executive offices.

(a)

All contested general elections of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Attorney General, except as provided in this section, shall be decided by the joint vote of both houses of the General Assembly, and in that joint meeting the President of the Senate shall preside.

(b)

If, following any general election, any person contests any election covered by this section, he or she shall present his or her petition to the General Assembly, setting forth the points on which he or she will contest the election and the facts which he or she will prove in support of the points, and he or she shall pray for leave to introduce his or her proofs.

(c)

A vote shall be taken by yeas and nays in each house as to whether the prayers shall be granted.

(d)

If a majority of the whole number of votes of both houses shall be in the affirmative, they shall appoint a joint committee to take testimony on the part of the petitioner and also on the part of the person whose place is contested. The committee shall have power to send for witnesses and to issue warrants under the hand of the chair to any judge or justice of the peace to take the deposition of witnesses at such time and place as the warrant shall direct. The points to which the testimony is to be taken shall be set forth in the warrants.

(e)

Reasonable notice shall be given by the party in whose favor depositions shall be allowed to be taken to the opposite party of the time and place of taking the depositions. The judge or justice shall proceed in all things, in the attendance of witnesses and in taking and certifying the testimony, as is directed in the preceding section.

(f)

The party shall also be allowed to attend the examination of witnesses before the committee and to cross-examine them, but no testimony shall be taken except in relation to the points set forth in the petition.

(g)

The committee shall report the facts to the two (2) houses, and the day shall be fixed by a joint resolution for the meeting of the two (2) houses to decide the contest, on which decision the yeas and nays shall be taken and entered on the journal of each house.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1009; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 6.

7-5-807. Election illegalities — Complaint — Grand jury investigation — Indictment — Trial.

(a)

If ten (10) reputable citizens of any county shall file a complaint with the circuit judge within twenty (20) days after any election alleging that illegal or fraudulent votes were cast, that fraudulent returns or certifications were made, or that the Political Practices Act was violated, the circuit judge, if in his or her opinion there is good ground to believe the charges to be true, shall convene a special term at once unless the regular term is in session or will convene within thirty (30) days.

(b)

If the charges come in a regular term, the judge shall specially charge the grand jury as to them.

(c)

Should a special term be called, it shall in all respects be as if convened by law. The circuit judge shall cause to be summoned grand and petit jurors, either on lists selected by the sheriff or by disinterested persons selected by him or her for that purpose, according to his or her opinion as to the best method to select unbiased jurors.

(d)

Should indictments be returned, either at a special or regular term, for violating the general, primary, or special election laws, the defendants shall be given a speedy trial at the term, and the court may adjourn terms of other courts in order that they may be tried, unless for good cause shown or in the interests of justice a continuance or change of venue is granted. No change of venue shall be granted in such cases except after a hearing and a finding by the court that the defendant cannot obtain a fair and impartial trial in the district of the county where the indictment is pending.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1005; Acts 2017, No. 600, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

The Political Practices Act, referred to in this section, is codified as §§7-1-103,7-1-104,7-3-108, and7-6-101 —7-6-104.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “the jury commissioners, by” preceding “the sheriff” in the second sentence of (c).

7-5-808. Finding of guilt — Effect.

(a)

Should it be proved to the satisfaction of the trial judge, in cases instituted under this subchapter, that a successful candidate has been guilty of violating the Political Practices Act or any of the laws regulating general, primary, or special elections, the circuit court shall enter the finding as a part of the judgment, irrespective of the determination of the issues in other suits filed under this subchapter or the verdict of the jury in a criminal prosecution.

(b)

The judgment to that effect shall operate to deprive the candidate of the nomination, and the vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided by law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1006.

Publisher's Notes.

The Political Practices Act, referred to in this section, is codified as §§7-1-103,7-1-104,7-3-108, and7-6-101 —7-6-104.

7-5-809. Determination of guilt after election — Effect.

(a)

Should a proceeding under previous sections of this subchapter or a criminal prosecution under the criminal penalties imposed in this act not be determined finally until after the election, if the defendant in the proceeding is elected to the office or is the nominee of a political party to the office, and if it is determined that he or she was not entitled to be elected or to the nomination or that the judgment contains a finding that he or she violated the Political Practices Act or any of the laws applicable to general, primary, or special elections, then the judgment shall operate as a forfeiture of nomination or ouster from office.

(b)

The vacancy shall be filled as provided by law for filling vacancies in nominations or office in case of death or resignation.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 10, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1007.

Publisher's Notes.

The Political Practices Act, referred to in this section, is codified as §§7-1-103,7-1-104,7-3-108, and7-6-101 —7-6-104.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401 —7-5-403,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

7-5-810. Contest of election results — Time for appeal.

An appeal to contest the determination of any election in any court of this state must be filed within seven (7) calendar days of the final certification of the election result as announced by a court as authorized by this subchapter, except in instances in which the Arkansas Constitution establishes a time frame for filing an appeal.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 514, § 1; 1997, No. 446, § 37.

Subchapter 9

— Voting and Elections Transparency Act of 2017

7-5-901. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “Voting and Elections Transparency Act of 2017”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1014, § 1.

7-5-902. Uncounted votes.

(a)

If for any reason a vote, including an absentee vote and a provisional vote, is not counted under this chapter, the county board of election commissioners shall promptly notify the person who cast the vote.

(b)

Notification under subsection (a) of this section shall be written notification and shall state the reason or reasons the vote was not counted.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1014, § 1.

7-5-903. Voter notification.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided under federal law and Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, the county clerk shall send written notification to a person when:

(1)

A person registers to vote for the first time;

(2)

The voter registration of a person becomes inactive; and

(3)

A person is removed or purged from a voter registration list.

(b)

If a person is removed or purged from a voter registration list under subdivision (a)(3) of this section, he or she has thirty (30) days to challenge the removal.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1014, § 1.

7-5-904. Election commissioners.

(a)

A member of the State Board of Election Commissioners or a county board of election commissioners shall not serve as a poll worker or a poll watcher on behalf of an individual candidate, political party, or ballot initiative.

(b)

A person shall not simultaneously serve on the State Board of Election Commissioners and a county board of election commissioners.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1014, § 1.

7-5-905. Documentation for long-term care or residential care facility residents.

(a)

The documentation required to be submitted by a person who is a resident of a long-term care facility or residential care facility licensed by the state under this chapter shall be standardized.

(b)

The Secretary of State's office shall develop, adopt, and make available a standardized form to satisfy the requirements under law concerning the documentation under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1014, § 1.